Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8608
Promotion of self-support; powers and duties.

To promote self-support of blind persons:

(1) The commission shall:

(a) Provide placement and career development services;

(b) Provide prevocational training;

(c) Support integration with and access to community-based educational and vocational training opportunities;

(d) Implement employer outreach and cultivation; and

(e) Develop inservice community-based recruitment and networking resources; and

(2) The commission may:

(a) Maintain employment databases;

(b) Facilitate small business incubation; and

(c) Develop recommendations for state contract preferences.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 8.